Georgia statutes. TITLE 30 Handicapped Persons
CHAPTER 7 Blind Persons’ Literacy Rights and Education

Editor’s notes.

The former chapter consisted of Code Sections 30-7-1 through 30-7-5, relating to an advisory commission on programs for the visually impaired and the hearing impaired, and was based on Ga. L. 1988, p. 1979, § 1 and Ga. L. 1990, p. 1943, § 1.

30-7-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Blind Persons’ Literacy Rights and Education Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

30-7-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1796, § 3.

30-7-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Blind student” means an individual who is eligible for special education services and who:

Has a visual acuity of 20/200 or less in the better eye with correcting lenses or has a limited field of vision such that the widest diameter subtends an angular distance of no greater than 20 degrees; or

Has a medically indicated expectation of visual deterioration.

“Braille” means the system of reading and writing through touch commonly known as standard English Braille.

“Individualized education program” means a written statement developed for a student eligible for special education services pursuant to Section 602(a)(20) of Part A of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C.A. Section 1401(a)(20).

History.

Code 1981, §

30-7-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1796, § 3.

30-7-3.
Individualized education program for blind students; evaluation of Braille skills.

Each blind student must be identified and, if appropriate, offered an individualized education program in consultation with a parent or legal guardian. While Braille is not required, it is presumed that Braille reading and writing are valuable skills and as needed are to be considered in the student’s transition plan.

No child who is blind may be denied the opportunity to receive instruction in Braille reading and writing if the child has the ability to read and write print.

Each blind student shall be evaluated to determine the need for Braille skills. The purpose of the evaluation shall be to determine the appropriate reading and writing media for the individual child.

Nothing in this Code section shall require the inclusion of Braille in a blind student’s individualized education program.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-7-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1796, § 3.

Cross references.

Delivery of deaf-blind services and techniques leading to maximum independence,
§

49-9-21

.

30-7-4.
Elements of individualized education program.

Instruction in Braille reading and writing shall be sufficient to enable each blind student to communicate effectively and efficiently with the same level of proficiency expected of the student’s peers of comparable ability and grade level.

For a student whose visual impairment affects the student’s reading and writing performance in relation to the student’s ability such that Braille instruction and use are indicated, an individualized education program shall include the following:

The results obtained from the evaluation required under Code Section 30-7-3;

How instruction in Braille will be implemented as the primary mode for learning through integration with other classroom activities;

The date on which Braille instruction will commence;

The length of the period of instruction and the frequency and duration of each instructional session; and

The level of competency in Braille reading and writing to be achieved by the end of the period and the objective assessment measures to be used.

For a student whose reading and writing performance is evaluated as commensurate with the student’s ability despite visual impairment so that Braille instruction and use are not required for the student’s individualized education program, the minutes of the individualized education program meeting shall include a statement which documents that the absence of Braille instruction or use will not impair the student’s ability to read and write effectively.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-7-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1796, § 3.